Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2904
Office of Dispute Resolution; established; director; qualifications; duties.

The Office of Dispute Resolution is hereby established in the office of the State Court Administrator. The director of the office shall be hired by the Supreme Court. The director may but need not be an attorney and shall be hired on the basis of his or her training and experience in mediation, restorative justice, and dispute resolution. The director shall administer the Dispute Resolution Act and shall serve as staff to the council.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 4.